Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1652.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(a)(1) of the act of September 9, 1965 (P.L.497, No.251), known as the Newborn Child Testing Act, is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:Section 3. Newborn Child Screening and Follow-up Program.--(a) In order to assist health care providers to determine whether treatment or other services are necessary to avert intellectual disability, physical disability or death, the department, with the approval of the Newborn Screening and Follow-up Technical Advisory Board, shall establish a program providing for:(1) The screening tests of newborn children and follow-up services for the following diseases:12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(xi) Gaucher disease.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1652PN2005 - 2 - 1234